Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1396.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9PUBLIC SERVANT DATA PRIVACYSec.901. Scope of chapter.902. Definitions.903. Nondisclosure of protected information.904. Enforcement.905. Construction.§ 901. Scope of chapter.This chapter provides for public servant data privacy.§ 902. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A legal entity that controls, is controlled by, is under common control or shares common bonding with another legal entity."Assignee." A person or entity to whom a person's right to bring a civil action for a violation of section 904 (relating to enforcement) has been assigned, in writing, by the covered person or the covered person's authorized agent."Associated person." An individual connected to a principal person by one of the following relationships:(1) A parent, spouse, child or grandchild of a principal person, whether a minor or adult.(2) A person sharing a primary residence with a principal person."Authorized agent." Any of the following persons or entities authorized to submit or revoke a request for nondisclosure of protected information on behalf of a covered person and to engage in communications and enforcement:(1) A designated trustee or other agent acting under a written power of attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of any covered person who is physically or mentally incapacitated.(2) A parent or legal guardian on behalf of any child who is a minor or who is otherwise entitled to nondisclosure under this act.(3) A person or entity that has been appointed under a written power of attorney by a covered person to act on the covered person's behalf with respect to this chapter.20260SB1396PN1887 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An agent acting on behalf of a Federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or the clerk of any United States District Court."Covered person." A principal person or associated person."Data broker." A person or entity that sells to a third party the protected information of an individual with whom the person or entity does not have a direct relationship. The term does not include a governmental agency or its representatives acting in an official capacity. The term does not include journalists, registered lobbyists, citizens acting in good faith to investigate public officials or the disclosure of information on matters of public interest lawfully obtained by the person or entity."Home address." A dwelling location at which an individual resides, including a physical address, mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, plot identification number, legal property description, neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates and any other descriptive property information that may reveal the home address."Home telephone number." A telephone number used primarily for personal communications or associated with personal communications devices, including a landline or cellular number."Judge." Any judge, judicial officer or magisterial district judge, as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Principal person." Any active, formerly active or retired:(1) Governor;(2) Lieutenant Governor;(3) member of the General Assembly; or(4) judge."Protected information." The term includes:20260SB1396PN1887 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A full home address, which includes the number, street, city and zip code of a primary residence or secondary residence.(2) A home telephone number.(3) A Social Security number or driver's license number."Publicly available information." As follows:(1) Information that is made available to the general public from:(i) Federal, State or municipal government records;(ii) widely distributed media, including protected information intentionally made available by the covered person to the general public and in which the covered person does not maintain a reasonable expectation of privacy; or(iii) a disclosure that is made to the general public as required by Federal, State or local law.(2) The term does not include:(i) Protected information that is created through the combination of protected information with publicly available information.(ii) Protected information made available by a covered person on a website or online service open to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where the covered person maintains a reasonable expectation of privacy by restricting the protected information to a specific audience."Sale of protected information." The exchange, combination, interchange, exposure or any other provision of access of protected information for monetary or other valuable consideration to a third party. The term does not include:20260SB1396PN1887 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the disclosure of protected information to a service provider that processes the protected information on behalf of the data broker;(2) the disclosure of protected information to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service requested by the covered person;(3) the disclosure or transfer of protected information to an affiliate of the data broker;(4) with the covered person's affirmative consent, the disclosure of protected information where the covered person affirmatively directs the data broker to disclose the protected information or intentionally uses the data broker to interact with a third party; or(5) the disclosure of publicly available information."Service provider." A person who collects, processes, retains or transfers personal data on behalf of and at the direction of a data broker or another service provider.§ 903. Nondisclosure of protected information.(a) Prohibition.--A covered person or an authorized agent seeking to prohibit the sale of protected information of the covered person by a data broker shall provide written notice to the data broker referencing this chapter and requesting that the data broker cease the disclosure of the covered person's protected information, as described in the notice.(b) Data brokers.--Upon notification under subsection (a), and not later than 10 business days following physical or electronic receipt of the notification, a data broker may not recklessly disclose or redisclose or otherwise make available, including on a publicly accessible Internet website, the protected information of the covered person.20260SB1396PN1887 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Duration.--Nondisclosure under this section shall last for the following time frames:(1) A principal person shall receive coverage for life.(2) An associated person shall receive coverage while connected to a principal person and as follows:(i) for a parent, spouse, child or grandchild of a principal person, or a person sharing custody of a minor child with a principal person, for 30 days after the connection terminates; or(ii) for an individual sharing a primary residence with a principal person, for 90 days after the connection terminates.§ 904. Enforcement.(a) Civil liability.--A data broker that violates section 903(b) (relating to nondisclosure of protected information) shall be liable to the covered person, the covered person's authorized agent or the covered person's assignee, who may bring a civil action in the appropriate court of common pleas.(b) Time limits.--A civil action under this section must be commenced within the following periods of limitation:(1) two years from the date the violation occurred; or(2) for a continuing violation, within two years from the last date the violation occurred.(c) Proceedings.--Proceedings shall be in accordance with the following:(1) A party accessing a data broker's website or other products or services for the purpose of determining whether the covered person's protected information is disclosed shall not, as a result of the access, be deemed to have agreed on behalf of the covered person or the covered person's 20260SB1396PN1887 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized agent or assignee to any website terms and conditions with respect to the covered person, associated person or the covered person's or associated person's assignee's rights under this chapter.(2) No prior verification of a covered person's status shall be required for the notice under section 903 to be effective. In a civil action, it shall be the covered person or the covered person's authorized agent's burden to prove status as a covered person by a preponderance of the evidence.(d) Limitation.--A disclosure of protected information is not a violation of this chapter if the disclosure is:(1) made with the express authorization of the covered person or the covered person's authorized agent, contingent upon the authorization being provided subsequent to the relevant nondisclosure request described in section 903; or(2) for the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction initiated by the covered person or the covered person's authorized agent.(e) Relief.--In a civil action, for violations of section 903, the court shall award:(1) the greater of actual damages for each violation of section 903;(2) punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of the law;(3) reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred; and(4) any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate.§ 905. Construction.20260SB1396PN1887 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This chapter shall be liberally construed. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude:(1) a covered person from complying with all required disclosure and filing requirements if the covered person is a candidate for public office; or(2) an individual from challenging the residency of a covered person if the covered person is a candidate for public office.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1396PN1887 - 8 - 123456789